Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Article 1. Creation, Changes of Corporate Structure, etc.

§§ 56-339 through 56-344.
Repealed by Acts 1956, c. 435.

§ 56-345.
Repealed by Acts 1996, cc. 114 and 157.

§ 56-345.1.
Notice; consolidation, merger, abandonments, or discontinuances.

Any railroad company operating in the Commonwealth that submits an application to the federal government for consolidation, merger, abandonment, or discontinuance shall, contemporaneously with such application, notify the Commission and the Governor of
such action.

History.
1996, cc. 114, 157.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
15 M.J. Public Service and State Corporation Commissions, § 21; 15 M.J. Railroads, § 2.